Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1154.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; traffic and safety study; State Route 64; report A. The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to conduct a traffic and safety study on State Route 64 from the city of Williams to the Grand Canyon. B. On or before December 31, 2026, the department shall submit a report on the study prescribed by subsection A of this section to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall include any recommendations for traffic and safety improvements along State Route 64.